Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-659
Security interest, defined.

Security interest shall mean an equitable title or property right in a vehicle reserved or created by agreement and which secures payment or performance of an obligation, including the interest of a lessor under a lease intended as security, and which is perfected when it is valid against third parties generally, subject only to specific statutory exceptions.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 155.